Utah statutes.
53B-2-111.   Dixie State University -- Institutional name change.

(1)  Dixie State College of Utah shall be known as Dixie State University.

(2)  Dixie State University is a continuation of Dixie State College of Utah and shall:

(a)  possess all rights, titles, privileges, powers, immunities, franchises, endowments, property, and claims of Dixie State College of Utah; and

(b)  fulfill and perform all obligations of Dixie State College of Utah, including obligations relating to outstanding bonds and notes.



Enacted by Chapter 10, 2013 General Session

